Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7008.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-28-7.3 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-28 entitled "Parking
Facilities and Privileges" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-28-7.3. Disability parking enforcement program.
(a) The state police, department of environmental management, airport corporation, capitol
police, department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, governor’s
commission on disabilities, and the state operated colleges shall establish a disability parking
enforcement enhancement programs no later than January 1, 2000. On or after July 1, 2026, the
governor's commission on disabilities shall review and provide comment on any amendments,
changes or updates to the disability parking enforcement program. The program will be designed
to improve enforcement of disability parking laws on state-owned property and in parking facilities
serving space leased or owned by the state, including state departments, agencies, boards,
commissions, and quasi-governmental corporations. Citations issued in conjunction with this
program shall be submitted to the traffic tribunal or its successor entity for collection pursuant to
§§ 31-28-7 and 31-28-7.1 and the fines collected through shall be paid over to the state agency or
college that issued the citation.
(b) The several cities and towns shall establish disability parking enforcement enhancement
programs. Citations issued in conjunction with local enforcement programs shall be submitted to
the municipal court, where established, or to the traffic tribunal or its successor entity. Fines

collected through citations issued in accordance with local enforcement program specifications
shall be paid over to the city or town or pursuant to §§ 31-28-7 and 31-28-7.1.
(c) Disability parking enforcement enhancement plans.
(1) The state police, department of environmental management, airport corporation, capitol
police, department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, and the state
operated colleges shall submit a disability parking enforcement enhancement plan to the governor’s
commission on disabilities.
(2) Cities and towns shall submit a disability parking enforcement enhancement plan to the
governor’s commission on the disability.
(3) The disability parking enforcement enhancement plans shall describe the enforcement
program which the state police, department of environmental management, airport corporation,
capitol police, department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals,
governor’s commission on disabilities, the state operated colleges or the municipality intends to
establish.
(4) The disability parking enforcement enhancement plan shall be reviewed by governor’s
commission on disabilities within sixty (60) days of receipt and suggest improvements to the
disability parking enforcement enhancement plans, that shall not be construed as required
amendments.
(d) The types of disability parking enforcement enhancement programs which may be put
in place in each municipality, and by the state police, department of environmental management,
airport corporation, capitol police, department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities
and hospitals, governor’s commission on disabilities, and the state operated colleges, may include,
but shall not be limited to:
(1) Enforcement programs which utilize persons deputized for the purpose of the disability
parking enforcement enhancement program. The disability parking enforcement deputies shall be
required to complete a minimum of four (4) hours training in parking enforcement before being
assigned to the program. Each municipality and the state police, department of environmental
management, airport corporation, capitol police, department of behavioral healthcare,
developmental disabilities and hospitals, governor’s commission on disabilities, and the state
operated colleges shall provide adequate training and shall assume all liability associated with
disability parking enforcement.
(2) Enforcement programs which specifically designate paid and trained personnel as staff
for the disability parking enforcement enhancement program. These personnel are not limited to
on-duty police officers, but may also include officers to be paid overtime, auxiliary personnel,
LC003563/SUB A - Page 2 of 4

special forces, retired personnel, and other paid employee deemed by the responsible authority to
be competent and qualified.
(e) Beginning January 1, 2027 and on each January 1 thereafter, cities and towns and the
state police, department of environmental management, airport corporation, capitol police,
department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, and the state
operated colleges shall be required to submit to the governor’s commission on disabilities an annual
progress report chronicling the collections of fines, procedures used, convictions, and any problems
or successes which result from the disability parking enforcement enhancement program.
Following receipt of an annual program report, the governor’s commission on disabilities may
suggest improvements to a disability parking enforcement enhancement program.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003563/SUB A
========
LC003563/SUB A - Page 3 of 4